Utah statutes.
23-27-202.   Reporting of invasive species required.

(1)  A person who discovers a Dreissena mussel within this state or has reason to believe a Dreissena mussel may exist at a specific location shall immediately report the discovery to the division.

(2)  A person who violates Subsection (1) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

